Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.110

Extortion—Definition.

"Extortion" means knowingly to obtain or attempt to obtain by threat property or services of the owner, and specifically includes sexual favors.

[ 1999 c 143 s 37; 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 10. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.110.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 4: See note following RCW 9A.48.070.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.